test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_II_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
     g̲íihlgii+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: g̲íihlgii
     g̲íihlgii+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgiiga
     g̲íihlgii+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii
     g̲íihlgii+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgiigang
     g̲íihlgii+V+DIRECT+PAST: g̲íihlgiigan
     g̲íihlgii+V+RELATIVE: g̲íihlgiis
     g̲íihlgii+V+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgiiang
     g̲íihlgii+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgiigang
     g̲íihlgii+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgiiganggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgiigangang
     g̲íihlgii+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgiigiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgiigaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgiigaangaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: g̲íihlgiiäsaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: g̲íihlgiiäs
     g̲íihlgii+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgiiäsaang
     g̲íihlgii+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgiiäsga
     g̲íihlgii+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgiiäsaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgiiäsaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asa'áa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asa'áang
     g̲íihlgii+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaasdláa
     g̲íihlgii+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaasdláang
     g̲íihlgii+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'uuj
     g̲íihlgii+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'uujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: g̲íihlgiiäsaa'uujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'us
     g̲íihlgii+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: g̲íihlgii'ujaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'uujaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgiiäsaa'us
     g̲íihlgii+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: g̲íihlgiiäsaa'ahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: g̲íihlgiiäseehl
     g̲íihlgii+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: g̲íihlgii'uu
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'waa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'waa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'waang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: g̲íihlgii'wägan
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: g̲íihlgii'aawaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: g̲íihlgii'aawaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: g̲íihlgii'waas
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: g̲íihlgii'aawaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgii'waa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgii'aawaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgiigang'waa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgiigang'waang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgiigang'waa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'wägiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'wägaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'wägaangaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: g̲íihlgii'waaäsaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: g̲íihlgii'waaäs
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'waaäsaang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'waaäsga
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'waaäsaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgii'waaäsaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'waa'uuj
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'waa'uujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: g̲íihlgii'waaäsaa'uujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'waa'us
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: g̲íihlgii'waa'ujaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'waa'uujaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'waaäsaa'us
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'waa'ahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: g̲íihlgii'waa'ahlanggan
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'waa'ahlanggiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'waaäsaa'ahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: g̲íihlgii'waa'ahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: g̲íihlgii'aawaa'ahlang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: g̲íihlgii'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'aawaa'ahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: g̲íihlgii'waa'ahl
     g̲íihlgii+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: g̲íihlgii'waaäseehl
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: g̲íihlgii'ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'angga
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'anggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: g̲íihlgii'anggan
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: g̲íihlgii'aangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: g̲íihlgii'aangaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: g̲íihlgii'ans
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: g̲íihlgii'aangaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgii'angang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgii'aangaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'anggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgiigang'anggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgiigang'angang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'anggiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'anggaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'anggaangaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: g̲íihlgii'angäsaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: g̲íihlgii'angäs
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'angäsaang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'angäsga
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'angäsaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgii'angäsaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaa'áng
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaa'ánggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'ang'uuj
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'ang'uujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: g̲íihlgii'angäsaa'uujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'ang'us
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: g̲íihlgii'ang'ujaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'ang'uujaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'angäsaa'us
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'aang'ahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: g̲íihlgii'aang'ahlanggan
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'aang'ahlanggiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'angäsaa'ahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: g̲íihlgii'aang'ahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: g̲íihlgii'aangaa'ahlang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: g̲íihlgii'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'aangaa'ahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: g̲íihlgii'aang'ahl
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: g̲íihlgii'angäseehl
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: g̲íihlgii'ang'uu
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'ang'waa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'ang'waa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'ang'waang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: g̲íihlgii'ang'wägan
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: g̲íihlgii'ang'aawaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: g̲íihlgii'ang'aawaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: g̲íihlgii'ang'waas
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: g̲íihlgii'ang'aawaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgii'ang'waa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgii'ang'aawaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgiigang'ang'waa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgiigang'ang'waang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgiigang'ang'waa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'ang'wägiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'ang'wägaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'ang'wägaangaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: g̲íihlgii'ang'waaäsaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: g̲íihlgii'ang'waaäs
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'ang'waaäsaang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'ang'waaäsga
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'ang'waaäsaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgii'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'ang'waa'uuj
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'ang'waa'uujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: g̲íihlgii'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'ang'waa'us
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: g̲íihlgii'ang'waa'ujaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'ang'waaäsaa'us
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: g̲íihlgii'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgii'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: g̲íihlgii'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: g̲íihlgii'ang'waa'ahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: g̲íihlgii'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: g̲íihlgii'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
